Utah statutes.
19-5-120.   Sewage permit program fee.
(1)  The department may assess a fee established under Section 63J-1-504
against persons required to obtain a permit under Section 19-5-108 for the
management of sewage sludge, to be applied to the costs of administering the
sewage permit program required by this chapter.
(2)  The total of the combined fees assessed against all permittees under this
section may not be more than $28,000 annually.
(3)  In establishing the fee for each  sludge disposal permit holder, the
department shall take into account the proportionate size of the population
served by the permit holder.
(4)  All proceeds from the fee shall be applied to the administering of the
sewage permit program required by this chapter.
